Maryland, session 2026, HB1557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–417.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2), “ADVISORY COMMITTEE” MEANS THE REAL ESTATE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE.
(3) “BOARD” MEANS THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS.
(4) “REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION” MEANS A LEASE, LEASE RENEWAL,
OR PURCHASE OF PROPERTY BY THE STATE GOVERNED BY §§ 4–411 THROUGH
4–416 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITH A TOTAL EXPECTED COST GREATER THAN $500,000
PER YEAR.
(B) THERE IS A REAL ESTATE ADVISORY COMMITTEE IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMITTEE IS TO ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT,
THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS, AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON INDUSTRY
TRENDS, DEVELOPMENTS AND MOVEMENT IN THE COMMERCIAL REAL ESTATE

HOUSE BILL 1557 3
SECTOR, AND BEST PRACTICES FOR REAL ESTATE ASSET MANAGEMENT IN THE
STATE.
(D) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) SIX MEMBERS WITH EXPERTISE IN REAL ESTATE PURCHASES,
LEASES, AND LEASE RENEWALS:
(I) TWO OF WHOM SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) TWO OF WHOM SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF
THE SENATE; AND
(III) TWO OF WHOM SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF
THE HOUSE; AND
(3) AS EX OFFICIO, NONVOTING MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(II) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED
BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.;
(2) FOUR MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY;
(3) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
AND
(4) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.
(D) (E) THE SECRETARY SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE
ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(E) (F) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE
SERVICES SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(F) (G) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COMMITTEE; BUT

HOUSE BILL 1557
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) THE COMMITTEE:
(1) SHALL MEET AT LEAST THREE TIMES ANNUALLY; AND
(2) SHALL REVIEW, AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR, THE STATE’S
LONG–TERM REAL ESTATE PLANS AND GOALS.
(G) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) PRIOR TO ANY FORMAL ACTION ON A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION
BY A STATE AGENCY, ADVISE THE STATE AGENCY OF ANY ISSUES OF CONCERN
REGARDING THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(2) ON THE SELECTION BY THE DEPARTMENT OF A LEAD OFFEROR,
IMMEDIATELY BEGIN REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION REVIEW;
(3) NOT LESS THAN 1 YEAR PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF A LEASE OF
PROPERTY UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, VOTE TO:
(I) MAKE A RECOMMENDATION AS TO WHETHER THE REAL
ESTATE TRANSACTION SHOULD MOVE FORWARD FOR SUBMISSION TO THE BOARD;
OR
(II) MAKE A RECOMMENDATION AS TO WHETHER A REAL ESTATE
TRANSACTION OR SPECIFIC PROVISIONS OF A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION SHOULD
BE REJECTED, REVISED, OR REMOVED PRIOR TO SUBMISSION TO THE BOARD FOR
APPROVAL; AND
(4) ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE DEPARTMENT’S LEASE
PROCUREMENT PROCEDURES.
(H) A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION OR SPECIFIC PROVISIONS NOT
RECOMMENDED FOR APPROVAL BY THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE UNDER
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE RESUBMITTED TO THE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE FOR ADDITIONAL REVIEW.
(I) EACH STATE AGENCY THAT SUBMITS A REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS FOR
A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION TO THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL INCLUDE WITH
THE AGENCY’S SUBMISSION:

HOUSE BILL 1557 5
(1) A FULL COST BENEFIT ANALYSIS COMPARING SIMILAR OR
COMPARABLE PROPERTIES AND PURCHASE OPTIONS, INCLUDING A COMPARISON
OF LEASE OPTIONS WITH PURCHASE OPTIONS, AND LEASE CONSOLIDATION
OPTIONS;
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF STATE AGENCY PARKING NEEDS AND COSTS,
INCLUDING ANY RELATED CONSIDERATIONS REGARDING THE PROPERTY;
(3) DOCUMENTS THAT JUSTIFY:
(I) REAL ESTATE TERMS IN EXCESS OF TIME OR COST IN EXCESS
OF ORDINARY AND REGULAR STATE CONTRACT TERMS;
(II) RENT ESCALATION RATES IN EXCESS OF MARKET RATES;
(III) CONSTRUCTION COSTS AND COSTS FOR ANY OTHER PART OF
THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION, WITH CONSIDERATION FOR THE
REASONABLENESS AND COST COMPETITIVENESS OF EACH ITEM;
(IV) REMOVAL OF ANY STANDARD REAL ESTATE PROVISIONS,
INCLUDING THE RIGHT TO TERMINATE THE LEASE OR TRANSACTION; AND
(V) ANY ISSUES REGARDING NONCOMPETITIVE
PROCUREMENTS;
(4) A FULL OR SIGNIFICANT RENOVATION COST ANALYSIS, DISTINCT
FROM THE OVERALL LEASE COST BENEFIT ANALYSIS, INCLUDING:
(I) A JUSTIFICATION FOR NONCOMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT
OF GOODS AND SERVICES;
(II) A DEMONSTRATION THAT COSTS ARE NECESSARY,
REASONABLE, AND APPROPRIATE; AND
(III) A DEMONSTRATION THAT FULL FUNDING IS AVAILABLE FOR
ALL RENOVATIONS; AND
(5) LANDLORD PAYMENT DOCUMENTATION, INCLUDING:
(I) TOTAL PAYMENTS TO DATE TO THE LANDLORD;
(II) PRIOR LEASE PAYMENTS;

HOUSE BILL 1557
(III) TAX CREDITS OR OTHER STATE BENEFITS GRANTED TO THE
LANDLORD; AND
(IV) TAX CREDITS OR OTHER STATE BENEFITS FOR THE
LOCATION OF THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION.
(J) A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION THAT IS SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD FOR
APPROVAL SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE’S RECOMMENDATIONS ON A REAL
ESTATE TRANSACTION OR SPECIFIC PROVISIONS OF A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
AND
(2) ALL INFORMATION SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(K) (I) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR,
BEGINNING IN 2026, THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL
REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR, THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS, THE DEPARTMENT, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A LIST OF ALL CURRENT REAL ESTATE TRANSACTIONS BY
THE STATE GOVERNED BY §§ 4–318 THROUGH 4–321 OF THIS TITLE AND §§ 4–411
THROUGH 4–416 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE TERM OF DURATION AND
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH EACH REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STATE AGENCIES THAT SUBMITTED
REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS FOR REAL ESTATE TRANSACTIONS TO THE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE;
(III) THE FINAL DISPOSITION OF EACH REQUEST FOR
PROPOSALS FOR A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(IV) THE SUBSEQUENT ACTION TAKEN BY THE AGENCY
FOLLOWING FINAL DISPOSITION OF EACH REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS FOR A REAL
ESTATE TRANSACTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1557 7
(V) FOLLOWING BOARD APPROVAL, THE STATUS OF REAL
ESTATE TRANSACTIONS PUBLISHED IN EMARYLAND MARKETPLACE, LISTING
WHETHER THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION PUBLICATION WAS ON TIME OR LATE.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ALL DATA REQUIRED IN THE
ANNUAL REPORT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE OR ON
A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE ONLINE DASHBOARD FOR PUBLIC REVIEW.
(L) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A STATE
AGENCY FROM SUBMITTING OR LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A STATE AGENCY TO
SUBMIT A REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION TO THE BOARD FOR APPROVAL.
10–305.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, any real or personal property
of the State or a unit of the State government may be sold, leased, transferred, exchanged,
granted, or otherwise disposed of:
(1) to any person, to the United States or any of its units, or to any unit of
the State government, for a consideration the Board decides is adequate; or
(2) to any county or municipal corporation in the State subject to any
conditions the Board imposes.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
this subsection applies to the sale, transfer, grant, or exchange of:
1. real property identified under § 5–310(c)(1) of this article;
and
2. State–owned real or personal property, funded in
accordance with an appropriation act of the General Assembly, that has an appraised value
over $100,000.
(ii) This subsection does not apply to the following dispositions of
property identified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. leasing the property;
2. the sale, transfer, grant, or exchange of a corrective or
access easement on the property; or
3. an exchange by the Department of Natural Resources
under § 1–109(e)(3) of the Natural Resources Article.

HOUSE BILL 1557
(2) The Board may not approve the sale, transfer, exchange, or grant of
property until:
(i) the Department of General Services or the Department of
Natural Resources under Title 1, Subtitle 1 of the Natural Resources Article has submitted
to the Board two independent appraisals of the property that:
1. with regard to real property, consider the value of any
restrictive covenant that may be placed on the property; and
2. may not be publicly disclosed if the property is to be sold
at auction;
(ii) the following information has been submitted, by electronic mail
or facsimile and by certified mail, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House
Appropriations Committee, and, for property that meets both criteria of paragraph (1)(i) of
this subsection, the Legislative Policy Committee:
1. a description of the property; and
2. if applicable, any justification for not selling, transferring,
exchanging, or granting the property in a manner that generates the highest return for the
State;
(iii) 45 days have elapsed since:
1. the information required by item (ii) of this paragraph was
received by the appropriate committees; and
2. the Board declared the property surplus; and
(iv) except for property sold under paragraph (4) of this subsection,
for property that meets both criteria under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection and for which
the Board intends to approve a fee simple sale, transfer, exchange, or grant, the General
Assembly has approved the proposed disposition as provided under paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(3) (i) Within 45 days after receiving the information submitted under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Legislative Policy Committee shall:
1. review the information and the public record created by
the Department of Planning for the property; and
2. A. approve the proposed disposition of the surplus
property and refer the property back to the Board for final disposition; or

HOUSE BILL 1557 9
B. refer the proposed disposition of the property to the full
General Assembly and notify the Board of the referral.
(ii) If the Legislative Policy Committee fails to take any action under
subparagraph (i)2 of this paragraph within the specified time period, the proposed
disposition shall be deemed approved by the Committee.
(iii) 1. If the proposed disposition of the surplus property is
referred by the Legislative Policy Committee to the full General Assembly, the proposed
disposition may not be approved by the Board unless it is approved by the passage of
legislation during the next legislative session of the General Assembly.
2. In any legislation passed in accordance with
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, the General Assembly may approve the proposed
disposition with or without conditions.
(4) If the Board has declared the property surplus, the Board shall sell the
property to the federal government, a local government, or a unit of federal or local
government for $1.00, if:
(i) the government or unit has indicated its interest in acquiring the
land; and
(ii) a restrictive covenant is placed on the deed of transfer, in
accordance with § 5–906(e)(7) and (8) of the Natural Resources Article, that requires the
property to be maintained in a use that is consistent with its use at the time of transfer.
(5) Any revenues derived from the sale, transfer, exchange, or grant of
property identified under paragraph (1)(i)1 of this subsection shall be deposited in the
Advance Option and Purchase Fund under § 5–904(b) of the Natural Resources Article.
(6) If the Board has declared the property surplus, the Board shall donate
or sell the property determined by the Department of Housing and Community
Development to be suitable for use or redevelopment as affordable housing in accordance
with a proposal developed under § 2–203 of the Housing and Community Development
Article.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) property that will be acquired with Program Open Space funds
under Title 5, Subtitle 9 of the Natural Resources Article;
(ii) property that will be acquired with Rural Legacy Program funds
under Title 5, Subtitle 9A of the Natural Resources Article;
(iii) property that will be acquired with Local Land Preservation
Program funds under Title 5, Subtitle 9B of the Natural Resources Article;

HOUSE BILL 1557
(iv) property that will be acquired with Community Parks and
Playgrounds Program funds under Title 5, Subtitle 9C of the Natural Resources Article;
(v) property that will be acquired with funds from the Heritage
Conservation Fund under Title 5, Subtitle 15 of the Natural Resources Article;
(vi) property that will be acquired with funds from the Forest and
Park Reserve Fund established under § 5–212 of the Natural Resources Article;
(vii) property that will be acquired with federal grant funds made
available to the Department of Natural Resources for open space, recreation, or
conservation purposes;
(viii) property that will be acquired by the Maryland Environmental
Trust;
(ix) a Maryland Agricultural Land Preservation Foundation
easement acquired under § 2–504 of the Agriculture Article;
(x) federally owned military property;
(xi) property that will be acquired by the Maryland Aviation
Administration; or
(xii) property that will be acquired by the Maryland Port
Administration.
(2) The Board may not approve the acquisition of real property with an
appraised value of at least $500,000 OR A NEW LEASE, OR THE EXECUTION OF A
RENEWAL OPTION OF 10 YEARS OR MORE, OF REAL PROPERTY THAT WILL BE USED
BY THE STATE THAT REQUIRES THE STATE TO MAKE PAYMENTS TOTALING AT LEAST
$500,000 $1,000,000 ANNUALLY unless the Board has provided to the Legislative Policy
Committee:
(i) a justification for the planned acquisition OR LEASE THAT
INCLUDES JUSTIFICATION FOR:
1. REAL ESTATE TERMS OF TIME OR COST IN EXCESS OF
ORDINARY AND REGULAR STATE CONTRACT TERMS;
2. RENT ESCALATION RATES IN EXCESS OF MARKET
RATES;

HOUSE BILL 1557 11
3. CONSTRUCTION COSTS AND COSTS FOR ANY OTHER
PART OF THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION, WITH CONSIDERATION FOR THE
REASONABLENESS AND COST COMPETITIVENESS OF EACH ITEM;
4. 3. REMOVAL OF ANY STANDARD REAL ESTATE
PROVISIONS, INCLUDING THE RIGHT TO TERMINATE THE LEASE OR TRANSACTION;
AND
5. 4. WHY THE TRANSACTION IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF
THE STATE; [and]
(II) A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS OF THE PLANNED ACQUISITION
OR LEASE THAT INCLUDES, WHEN APPLICABLE, COMPARING SIMILAR OR
COMPARABLE PROPERTIES AND PURCHASE OPTIONS, INCLUDING A COMPARISON
OF LEASE OPTIONS WITH PURCHASE OPTIONS, LEASE CONSOLIDATION OPTIONS,
AND IF RELEVANT, AN ANALYSIS OF STATE AGENCY PARKING NEEDS AND COSTS,
AND TAX CREDITS OR OTHER STATE BENEFITS GRANTED TO THE LANDLORD OR FOR
THE LOCATION OR REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION;
(III) IF APPLICABLE, A FULL OR SIGNIFICANT RENOVATION COST
ANALYSIS, DISTINCT FROM THE OVERALL ACQUISITION OR LEASE COST–BENEFIT
ANALYSIS, INCLUDING:
1. A JUSTIFICATION FOR NONCOMPETITIVE
PROCUREMENT OF GOODS AND SERVICES; AND
2. A DEMONSTRATION THAT FULL FUNDING IS
AVAILABLE FOR ALL RENOVATIONS;
(IV) IF APPLICABLE, LANDLORD PAYMENT DOCUMENTATION,
INCLUDING:
1. TOTAL PAYMENTS MADE TO THE LANDLORD TO DATE;
2. PRIOR LEASE PAYMENTS;
3. TAX CREDITS OR OTHER STATE BENEFITS GRANTED
TO THE LANDLORD; AND
4. TAX CREDITS OR OTHER STATE BENEFITS FOR THE
LOCATION OR THE REAL ESTATE TRANSACTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1557
[(ii)] (V) (IV) on request of the cochairs of the Legislative Policy
Committee made within 14 days after receiving the justification under [item] ITEMS (i)
THROUGH (IV) (III) of this paragraph:
1. [a cost–benefit analysis of the planned acquisition; and
2.] at least 45 days to review the information provided under
this paragraph and comment on the planned acquisition before the acquisition is approved;
AND
2. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY
COMMITTEE MAY NEED TO COMPLETE THEIR REVIEW.
(3) If the acquisition of real property with an appraised value of at least
$500,000 from the federal government would require the State to provide ongoing
maintenance of the property, the Board may not approve the acquisition until the Board
has provided to the Legislative Policy Committee:
(i) notice that the acquisition would require the State to provide
ongoing maintenance of the property; and
(ii) on request of the cochairs of the Legislative Policy Committee
within 14 days after receiving the notice provided under item (i) of this paragraph, a study
regarding the ongoing fiscal impact the acquisition would have on the State, including any
environmental mitigation that may be required.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(1) if any real or personal property disposed of under this section is not
under the jurisdiction or control of any particular unit of the State government, the deed,
lease, or other evidence of conveyance of the real or personal property shall be executed by
the Board; and
(2) if any real or personal property disposed of under this section is under
the jurisdiction or control of a unit of the State government, the deed, lease, or other
evidence of conveyance of the real or personal property shall be executed by the highest
official of the unit and by the Board.
(e) (1) Whenever any unit of the State government leases any State–owned
property under its jurisdiction and control to any State employee, agent, or servant, or to
any other individual in State service, for the purpose of permitting the individual to
maintain a residence on or in the property, the lease shall be:
(i) executed by the unit; and
(ii) approved by the Secretary of General Services.

HOUSE BILL 1557 13
(2) The lease is not valid unless the Secretary of General Services approves
it.
(3) Whenever any unit of the State government leases any State–owned
property under its jurisdiction and control to any lessee, the lease shall include a provision
which prohibits the lessee from assigning or subleasing that property without the prior
approval of the Board of Public Works.
(4) (i) Whenever the State Highway Administration leases any
State–owned property under its jurisdiction and control to any person, the Administrator
of the State Highway Administration may execute the lease if:
1. the lease is entered into on a 30–day renewable basis; and
2. the duration of the tenancy does not exceed 1 year.
(ii) At least twice each year, the Administrator of the State Highway
Administration shall submit a report of the leases executed under the authority granted in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to the Board of Public Works.
(5) (i) Whenever the Department of Natural Resources leases any
State–owned property under its jurisdiction and control to any lessee, the lease shall
include a provision that requires the lessee to:
1. maintain unobstructed access to trail heads by trail users
and first responders; and
2. ensure that the trail heads remain free of obstructions at
all times.
(ii) At least once each year, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
submit a report of all leases executed by the Department of Natural Resources to the
Department of General Services.
(f) (1) On the sale, lease, transfer, exchange, or other disposition of any real
or personal property owned or controlled by the State Retirement and Pension System or
the State of Maryland for the use of the Board of Trustees of the State Retirement and
Pension System, any conveyancing document shall be executed in the manner provided in
Division II of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(2) Any sale, lease, transfer, exchange or other disposition of any real or
personal property owned or controlled by the State Retirement and Pension System or the
State of Maryland for the use of the Board of Trustees of the State Retirement and Pension
System by a conveyancing document executed by or for the Board of Trustees of the State
Retirement and Pension System before October 1, 1994 in the manner provided under
former Article 73B is ratified and confirmed.

HOUSE BILL 1557
(g) All conveyances under this section shall be made in the name of the State of
Maryland, acting through the executing authority provided for in this section.
(h) This section does not apply to any lease or other temporary transfer, grant, or
disposition of State real or personal property in connection with a procurement made
subject to § 11–202(3) of this article.
(i) The Department of Budget and Management and Department of General
Services, with the approval of the Board, shall adopt regulations in accordance with Title
10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article to implement the provisions of this section.
10–305.
(J) THE BOARD MAY NOT APPROVE THE SALE, TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR
GRANT OF A PROPERTY LOCATED BETWEEN THE EAST 21ST AND EAST 22ND BLOCKS
OF GUILFORD AVENUE IN BALTIMORE UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
SERVICES DEMONSTRATES TO THE BOARD THAT:
(1) THE DEPARTMENT ENGAGED THE COMMUNITY AND RELEVANT
STAKEHOLDERS WHEN MAKING THE DECISION TO SELL, TRANSFER, EXCHANGE, OR
GRANT THE PROPERTY; AND
(2) IF PRACTICABLE, THE DEPARTMENT PRIORITIZED THE
COMMUNITY’S PREFERRED OUTCOME.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.